Maryland, session 2025, HB0748.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
10–402.
(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this subtitle it is unlawful for any
person to:
(1) Willfully intercept, endeavor to intercept, or procure any other person
to intercept or endeavor to intercept, any wire, oral, or electronic communication;
(2) Willfully disclose, or endeavor to disclose, to any other person the
contents of any wire, oral, or electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know
that the information was obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic
communication in violation of this subtitle; or
(3) Willfully use, or endeavor to use, the contents of any wire, oral, or
electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know that the information was
obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic communication in violation
of this subtitle.
(c) (11) (i) 1. In this paragraph the following words have the meanings
indicated.
2. “Body–worn digital recording device” means a device worn
on the person of a law enforcement officer that is capable of recording video and intercepting
oral communications.
3. “Electronic control device” has the meaning stated in §
4–109 of the Criminal Law Article.
4. “LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” INCLUDES A
MUNICIPAL ENFORCEMENT OFFICER DULY AUTHORIZED UNDER § 6–103.1 OF THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE TO USE A BODY–WORN CAMERA DURING THE
COURSE OF THE OFFICER’S DUTIES.
(ii) It is lawful under this subtitle for a law enforcement officer in
the course of the officer’s regular duty to intercept an oral communication with a
body–worn digital recording device or an electronic control device capable of recording video
and oral communications if:

HOUSE BILL 748 3
1. The law enforcement officer is in uniform or prominently
displaying the officer’s badge or other insignia;
2. The law enforcement officer is making reasonable efforts
to conform to standards in accordance with § 3–511 of the Public Safety Article for the use
of body–worn digital recording devices or electronic control devices capable of recording
video and oral communications;
3. The law enforcement officer is a party to the oral
communication;
4. Law enforcement notifies, as soon as is practicable, the
individual that the individual is being recorded, unless it is unsafe, impractical, or
impossible to do so; and
5. The oral interception is being made as part of a videotape
or digital recording.
(iii) Failure to notify under subparagraph (ii)4 of this paragraph does
not affect the admissibility in court of the recording if the failure to notify involved an
individual who joined a discussion in progress for which proper notification was previously
given.
Article – Local Government
6–103.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE OR
AGENT OF A MUNICIPALITY WHO IS AUTHORIZED TO ACT AS A CODE ENFORCEMENT,
PARKING ENFORCEMENT, OR TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT OFFICER FOR THE
MUNICIPALITY.
(A) (B) A MUNICIPALITY MAY ADOPT AN ORDINANCE OR A RESOLUTION
AUTHORIZING AN OFFICIAL WHO IS AUTHORIZED TO ACT AS AN ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER TO UTILIZE A BODY–WORN CAMERA DURING THE COURSE OF THE
OFFICIAL’S ENFORCEMENT OFFICER’S DUTIES.
(B) (C) A MUNICIPALITY THAT ADOPTS AN ORDINANCE OR A RESOLUTION
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH A
POLICY FOR THE ISSUANCE AND USE OF A BODY–WORN CAMERA BY AN
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER THAT ADDRESSES:
(1) THE TESTING OF BODY–WORN CAMERAS TO ENSURE ADEQUATE
FUNCTIONING;

HOUSE BILL 748
(2) THE PROCEDURE FOR AN ENFORCEMENT OFFICER TO FOLLOW IF
THE CAMERA FAILS TO OPERATE PROPERLY AT THE BEGINNING OF OR DURING THE
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER’S SHIFT;
(3) WHEN RECORDING IS MANDATORY;
(4) WHEN RECORDING IS PROHIBITED;
(5) WHEN RECORDING IS DISCRETIONARY;
(6) WHEN RECORDING MAY REQUIRE CONSENT OF A SUBJECT BEING
RECORDED;
(7) WHEN A RECORDING MAY BE ENDED;
(8) PROVIDING NOTICE OF RECORDING;
(9) ACCESS TO AND CONFIDENTIALITY OF RECORDINGS;
(10) THE SECURE STORAGE OF DATA FROM A BODY–WORN CAMERA;
(11) REVIEW AND USE OF RECORDINGS;
(12) RETENTION OF RECORDINGS;
(13) DISSEMINATION AND RELEASE OF RECORDINGS;
(14) CONSEQUENCES FOR VIOLATIONS OF THE MUNICIPALITY’S
BODY–WORN CAMERA POLICY;
(15) NOTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS WHEN ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL
BECOMES A PARTY TO THE COMMUNICATION FOLLOWING THE INITIAL
NOTIFICATION;
(16) SPECIFIC PROTECTIONS FOR INDIVIDUALS WHEN THERE IS AN
EXPECTATION OF PRIVACY IN PRIVATE OR PUBLIC PLACES; AND
(17) ANY ADDITIONAL ISSUES DETERMINED TO BE RELEVANT IN THE
IMPLEMENTATION AND USE OF BODY–WORN CAMERAS BY ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS
IS CONSISTENT WITH THE POLICY PUBLISHED BY THE MARYLAND POLICE TRAINING
AND STANDARDS COMMISSION UNDER § 3–511 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE
FOR THE ISSUANCE AND USE OF BODY–WORN CAMERAS BY LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICERS.

HOUSE BILL 748 5
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.